Vermont, session 2025-2026, S276.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 863a is added to read:
§ 863a. MUNICIPAL VOTE TO PERMIT OPERATION OF CANNABIS
ESTABLISHMENTS
(a) At the 2026 general election, a city, town, or incorporated village that as
of July 1, 2026, has not voted on the question of whether to affirmatively
permit the operation of cannabis establishments within the municipality shall
VT LEG #385793 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.276
2026 Page 2 of 2
vote on the article contained in this section. A city, town, or incorporated
village shall vote on the article by Australian ballot.
(b) The warning for the election shall contain an article providing for a vote
upon the following question:
Shall licensed cannabis retailers be authorized to operate in this
municipality?
Yes ___ No ___
(c) A vote to permit the operation of a licensed cannabis retailer or
integrated licensee within the municipality may be rescinded pursuant to the
provisions of section 863 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385793 v.1